Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.76.160

Introducing contraband in the third degree.

(1) A person is guilty of introducing contraband in the third degree if he or she knowingly and unlawfully provides contraband to any person confined in a detention facility or secure facility under chapter 71.09 RCW.

(2) (a) This section does not apply to an attorney representing a client confined in a secure facility under chapter 71.09 RCW for the purposes of bringing discovery or other legal materials to assist the client in the civil commitment process under chapter 71.09 RCW; PROVIDED, That:

(i) The attorney must be present when the materials are being reviewed or handled by the client; and

(ii) The attorney must take the materials and any and all copies of the materials when leaving the secure facility.

(3) Introducing contraband in the third degree is a misdemeanor.

[ 2013 c 43 s 5; 2011 c 336 s 406; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.76.160.]